verbo/espanol_verbo_imperativo_negativa.foma
define ImperNegTu1 [a r "*""*"] -> {es} || _ 2;
define ImperNegElla1 [a r "*""*"] -> e || _ 3;
define ImperNegNos1 [a r "*""*"] -> {emos} || _ 4;
define ImperNegVos1 [a r "*""*"] -> {éis} || _ 5;
define ImperNegUst1 [a r "*""*"] -> {en} || _ 6;

define ImperNegTu2 [e r "*""*"] -> {as} || _ 2;
define ImperNegElla2 [e r "*""*"] -> a || _ 3;
define ImperNegNos2 [e r "*""*"] -> {amos} || _ 4;
define ImperNegVos2 [e r "*""*"] -> {áis} || _ 5;
define ImperNegUst2 [e r "*""*"] -> {an} || _ 6;

define ImperNegTu3 [i r "*""*"] -> {as} || _ 2;
define ImperNegElla3 [i r "*""*"] -> a || _ 3;
define ImperNegNos3 [i r "*""*"] -> {amos} || _ 4;
define ImperNegVos3 [i r "*""*"] -> {áis} || _ 5;
define ImperNegUst3 [i r "*""*"] -> {an} || _ 6;

define ImperNeg1 ImperNegTu1 .o. ImperNegElla1 .o. ImperNegNos1 .o. ImperNegVos1 .o. ImperNegUst1;
define ImperNeg2 ImperNegTu2 .o. ImperNegElla2 .o. ImperNegNos2 .o. ImperNegVos2 .o. ImperNegUst2;
define ImperNeg3 ImperNegTu3 .o. ImperNegElla3 .o. ImperNegNos3 .o. ImperNegVos3 .o. ImperNegUst3;

define ImperNeg ImperNeg1 .o. ImperNeg2 .o. ImperNeg3;
